Utah statutes.
73-1-14.   Interfering with waterworks or with apportioning official --
Penalty and liability.
(1)  Any person, who in any way unlawfully interferes with, injures, destroys
or removes any dam, head gate, weir, casing, valve, cap or other appliance for
the diversion, apportionment, measurement or regulation of water, or who
interferes with any person authorized to apportion water while in the
discharge of his duties, is guilty of a crime punishable under Section
73-2-27.
(2)  Any person who commits an act defined as a crime under this section is
also liable in a civil action for damages or other relief to any person
injured by that act.
(3) (a)  A civil action under this section may be brought independent of a
criminal action.
(b)  Proof of the elements of a civil action under this section need only be
made by a preponderance of the evidence.
